Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.21A RCW to read as follows:The laboratory accreditation account is created in the state treasury. All receipts received by the state from the fees imposed under RCW 43.21A.230 must be deposited in the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to develop and implement activities authorized under RCW 43.21A.230.Sec. 2. RCW 70A.540.130 and 2022 c 179 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department and local authorities may assess and collect such fees as may be necessary to recover the direct and indirect costs associated with the implementation of this chapter.(2) Fees collected by the department under this section must be deposited into the air pollution control account created in RCW 70A.15.1010 and may only be used by the department to implement this chapter.Sec. 3. RCW 70A.15.1010 and 2022 c 179 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The air pollution control account is established in the state treasury. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the department from RCW 70A.15.2200(2), and receipts from nonpermit program sources under RCW 70A.15.2210(1) and 70A.15.2230(7), and all receipts from RCW 70A.15.5090, 70A.15.5120, ((and)) 70A.540.120, and 70A.540.130 shall be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only to develop and implement the provisions of this chapter, chapters 70A.25 and 70A.540 RCW, and RCW 70A.60.060. Moneys collected under RCW 70A.540.120 and 70A.540.130 may only be used to implement chapter 70A.540 RCW.(2) The amounts collected and allocated in accordance with this section shall be expended upon appropriation except as otherwise provided in this section and in accordance with the following limitations:Portions of moneys received by the department of ecology from the air pollution control account shall be distributed by the department to local authorities based on:(a) The level and extent of air quality problems within such authority's jurisdiction;(b) The costs associated with implementing air pollution regulatory programs by such authority; and(c) The amount of funding available to such authority from other sources, whether state, federal, or local, that could be used to implement such programs.(3) The air operating permit account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts collected by or on behalf of the department from permit program sources under RCW 70A.15.2210(1), 70A.15.2260, 70A.15.2270, and 70A.15.2230(7) shall be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for the activities described in RCW 70A.15.2210(1), 70A.15.2260, 70A.15.2270, and 70A.15.2230(7). Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.--- END ---